Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB694.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 6109(h)(1) introductory paragraph of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended and the subsection is amended by adding a paragraph to read:§ 6109. Licenses.* * *(h) Fee.--(1) [In] Except as provided under paragraph (3.1), in addition to fees described in [paragraphs (2)(ii) and] paragraph (3), the fee for a license to carry a firearm is $19. This includes all of the following:* * *(3.1) Fees provided for under paragraphs (1) and (3) shall be waived for an applicant who is active duty or an 123456789101112131415161718 honorably discharged veteran of the armed forces of the United States.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0694PN0704 - 2 - 1234